Utah statutes.
32B-5-203.   Commission and department duties before issuing a retail license.

(1) (a)  Before the commission may issue a retail license, the department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings to gather information and make recommendations to the commission as to whether a retail license should be issued.

(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's determination.

(2)  Before issuing a retail license, the commission shall:

(a)  determine that the person filed a complete application and is in compliance with:

(i)  Section 32B-5-201; and

(ii)  the specific licensing requirements specified in the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act, for the type of retail license for which the person is applying;

(b)  determine that the person is not disqualified under Section 32B-1-304;

(c)  consider the locality within which the proposed licensed premises is located, including:

(i)  physical characteristics such as:

(A)  condition of the licensed premises;

(B)  square footage; and

(C)  parking availability; and

(ii)  operational factors such as:

(A)  tourist traffic;

(B)  demographics;

(C)  population to be served;

(D)  proximity to and density of other state stores, package agencies, and retail licensees; and

(E)  the extent of and proximity to any community location;

(d)  consider the person's ability to manage and operate a retail license of the type for which the person is applying, including:

(i)  management experience;

(ii)  past retail alcoholic product experience; and

(iii)  the type of management scheme to be used by the retail licensee;

(e)  consider the nature or type of retail licensee operation of the proposed retail licensee, including:

(i)  the type of menu items that will be offered and emphasized;

(ii)  whether the retail licensee will emphasize service to an adult clientele or to minors;

(iii)  the proposed hours of operation;

(iv)  the seating capacity of the premises; and

(v)  the estimated gross sales of food items; and

(f)  consider any other factor the commission considers necessary.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

